Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.8742

Technical colleges—Employee option to reenroll in public employees' benefits trust.

Employees of technical colleges who were members of the [a] public employees' benefits trust and as a result of chapter 238, Laws of 1991, were required to enroll in public employees' benefits board-sponsored plans, must decide whether to reenroll in the trust by January 1, 1996, or the expiration of the current collective bargaining agreements, whichever is later. Employees of a bargaining unit or administrative or managerial employees otherwise not included in a bargaining unit shall be required to transfer by group. Administrative or managerial employees shall transfer in accordance with rules established by the health care authority. If employee groups elect to transfer, they are eligible to reenroll in the public employees' benefits board-sponsored plans. This one-time reenrollment option in the public employees' benefits board-sponsored plans is available to be exercised in January 2001, or only every five years thereafter, until exercised.

[ 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 28A.400.410.